Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 6
ENTITY NAMES

Law reviews:

For article, "Entity and Trade Name Filing Requirements and

C

ustoms in

C

olorado -- Part I", see 41 Colo. Law. 57 (Nov. 2012); for article, "Entity and Trade Name Filing Requirements and Customs in Colorado -- Part II", see 41 Colo. Law. 25 (Dec. 2012).

7-90-601. Entity name.

An entity name shall not contain any term the inclusion of which would violate any statute of this state.

Except as provided in section

7-90-604

(4.5), each entity name shall be distinguishable on the records of the secretary of state from every:

Other entity name; and

Name that is reserved with the secretary of state for another person as an entity name pursuant to section

7-90-602

.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2004, p. 1544, § 5, effective May 30, 2006.)

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2003, p. 2298, § 212, effective July 1, 2004.)

In addition to the requirements of subsection (2) of this section:

The entity name of a corporation shall contain the term or abbreviation "corporation", "incorporated", "company", "limited", "corp.", "inc.", "co.", or "ltd."; except that this paragraph (a) shall not apply to any of the following:

A domestic corporation incorporated before January 1, 1959, whose domestic entity name has not been changed by amendment to its articles of incorporation effective after December 31, 1958;

A domestic corporation incorporated under a statute of this state that permits the use of other names; or

Savings and loan associations covered by section 11-41-102, C.R.S.

The entity name of a nonprofit corporation may, but need not, contain the term or abbreviation "corporation", "incorporated", "company", "limited", "corp.", "inc.", "co.", or "ltd.".

The entity name of a limited liability company shall contain the term or abbreviation "limited liability company", "ltd. liability company", "limited liability co.", "ltd. liability co.", "limited", "l.l.c.", "llc", or "ltd.".

The entity name of a limited liability partnership shall contain the term or abbreviation "limited liability partnership", "registered limited liability partnership", "limited", "llp", "l.l.p.", "rllp", "r.l.l.p.", or "ltd.".

The entity name of a limited partnership, that is not a limited liability limited partnership, shall contain the term or abbreviation "limited partnership", "limited", "company", "l.p.", "lp", "ltd.", or "co.".

Notwithstanding the provisions of subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (e), any limited partnership in existence on October 31, 1981, shall be entitled to elect to be governed by the provisions of article 62 of this title with the true name it had on October 31, 1981.

The entity name of a limited liability limited partnership shall contain the term or abbreviation "limited partnership", "limited", "company", "limited liability limited partnership" or "registered limited liability limited partnership", "l.p.", "lp","co.", "l.l.l.p.", "lllp", "LTD.", "r.l.l.l.p.", or "rlllp"; or

When the name of a limited partnership that is registered as a limited liability limited partnership in the records of the office of the secretary of state is the same as that stated in a certificate of limited partnership, amended certificate of limited partnership, or statement of registration delivered on or after May 24, 1995, for filing by the secretary of state with respect to the limited partnership and if, upon filing of such certificate or statement, the name was modified by the addition of any word or initial to indicate that the limited partnership is a limited liability limited partnership, then the limited partnership may acquire, convey, and encumber title to real and personal property and otherwise deal in such name with or without the addition of such word or initial. The fact of the filing of such certificate or statement and the modification of the name of the limited partnership by such additional word or initial may be stated in an affidavit executed by a general partner of the limited partnership or a statement of authority executed pursuant to section 38-30-172, C.R.S., and shall be prima facie evidence of such facts and of the authority of the person executing the same to do so on behalf of the limited partnership. The affidavit may be recorded with the county clerk and recorder of any county.

An entity name must meet the requirements of section 7-90-301 (5).

The words or abbreviations "public benefit corporation", "P.B.C.", "PBC", and "Pub. Ben. Corp." may be used in an entity name only by corporations and cooperatives that are organized as public benefit corporations under part 5 of article 101 of this title 7.

The entity name of a cooperative may, but need not, contain the term or abbreviation "cooperative", "association", "incorporated", "company", "limited", "coop", "ass'n", "assn", "assoc.", "inc.", "co.", or "ltd.".

(4.5) The entity name of a limited cooperative association shall contain the words "limited cooperative association" or "limited cooperative" or the abbreviation "L.C.A." or "LCA". "Limited" may be abbreviated as "Ltd.". "Cooperative" may be abbreviated as "Co-op" or "Coop". "Association" may be abbreviated as "Assoc." or "Assn.".

For an entity that is specifically permitted by C.R.C.P. 265 or title 12, C.R.S., to use the words "professional company", "professional corporation", or abbreviations thereof in its name:

"P.c." or "pc" shall be a permitted abbreviation for such an entity that is a corporation;

"P.l.l.c." or "pllc" shall be a permitted abbreviation for such an entity that is a limited liability company;

"P.l.l.p." or "pllp" shall be a permitted abbreviation for such an entity that is a limited liability partnership.

The abbreviations stated in subsection (5) of this section are in addition to all others that may be permitted by law.

A person shall not use the word "cooperative" or an abbreviation or derivation of it as a part of its business or domestic entity name or as a trade name, trademark, service mark, brand, or designation except:

An entity incorporated under or subject to article 55, 56, or 58 of this title 7, part 10 of article 16 of title 10, article 33.5 of title 38, or a similar law of another jurisdiction;

An entity operated on a cooperative basis;

An entity described in section 501 (c)(6) of the "Internal Revenue Code of 1986", as amended;

An association of two or more of the entities described in subparagraphs (I) to (III) of this paragraph (a); or

As authorized by section 7-56-205 or as otherwise required or authorized by any other statute.

An entity described in this subsection (7), or one or more members of such an entity, may, without the necessity of posting a bond, bring an action for an injunction or for actual damages incurred as a result of a violation of this subsection (7) or to enforce this subsection (7). Upon proof that the word "cooperative" or an abbreviation or derivation of that word is used in violation of this section, the court shall enter an order permanently enjoining such use of the word. The prevailing party in the action shall be awarded judgment against the other party for the attorney fees and costs of litigation incurred by the prevailing party in the action. This section shall not apply to any person that has been continuously using the word "cooperative" or an abbreviation or derivation of that word in the person's business on or before July 5, 1973, as part of its trade name, business name, trademark, service mark, brand, true name, or designation.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire part added, p. 973, § 47, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(3)(f)(II) amended, p. 1844, § 100, effective July 1; (3)(f)(II) amended, p. 1708, § 98, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

(2) and (3) amended and (4) added, p. 2298, § 212, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(3)(c), (3)(e)(II), and (3)(f)(I) amended and (5) and (6) added, p. 1485, § 225, effective July 1; (2) amended, p. 1544, § 5, effective May 30, 2006.

L. 2006:

IP(5) amended, p. 874, § 55, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

IP(2) amended, p. 242, § 31, effective May 29.

L. 2008:

(7) added, p. 20, § 6, effective August 5.

L. 2011:

(4.5) added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 820, § 3, effective April 2, 2012.

L. 2017:

(3)(h) added, (HB 17-1200), ch. 386, p. 2001, § 6, effective August 9.

L. 2019:

(3)(g), IP(7)(a), and (7)(a)(I) amended, (SB 19-086), ch. 166, p. 1921, § 20, effective July 1, 2020.

7-90-601.5. Domestic entity name and trade name of dissolved domestic entity.

If a domestic entity that has a constituent filed document dissolves, the domestic entity name of the dissolved entity shall include the word "dissolved" followed by the month, day, and year of the effective date of dissolution of the entity.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2007, p. 242, § 32, effective May 29, 2007.)

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire section added, p. 2300, § 213, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 1486, § 226, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 1209, § 12, effective October 1.

L. 2006:

Entire section amended, p. 874, § 56, effective May 30.

L. 2007:

Entire section amended, p. 242, § 32, effective May 29.

7-90-601.6. Entity name of delinquent entity.

The entity name of a delinquent entity shall include the word "delinquent", followed by the month, day, and year of the effective date of the entity's delinquency, after the four-hundredth day after the effective date of its delinquency under section 7-90-902 (1).

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2007, p. 242, § 33, effective May 29, 2007.)

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire section added, p. 1210, § 13, effective October 1.

L. 2006:

Entire section amended, p. 874, § 57, effective May 30.

L. 2007:

Entire section amended, p. 242, § 33, effective May 29.

L. 2010:

(1) amended, (HB 10-1403), ch. 404, p. 1998, § 16, effective August 11.

7-90-601.7. Foreign entity name and trade name of withdrawn foreign entity.

If a foreign entity has a statement of foreign entity authority on file in the records of the secretary of state, but such authority has been relinquished, the foreign entity name of the foreign entity shall include the words "Colorado authority relinquished" followed by the effective date of the statement of foreign entity withdrawal by which the foreign entity relinquished its authority.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2007, p. 243, § 34, effective May 29, 2007.)

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire section added, p. 1486, § 227, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 1210, § 14, effective October 1.

L. 2006:

Entire section amended, p. 874, § 58, effective May 30.

L. 2007:

Entire section amended, p. 243, § 34, effective May 29.

7-90-602. Reserved entity name.

Any person may apply for the reservation of the exclusive use of a name as an entity name by delivering a statement of reservation of a name to the secretary of state, for filing pursuant to part 3 of this article, stating the name and mailing address of the person, that the person is applying under this section to reserve a name for use as an entity name, and the name proposed to be reserved. If the secretary of state determines that the name applied for would be available for use as an entity name under section 7-90-601, the secretary of state shall reserve the name for the person's exclusive use for a one-hundred-twenty-day period, which reservation may be renewed successively for one-hundred-twenty-day periods. No statement of reservation of name shall state a delayed effective date.

The holder of a reserved name may transfer the reservation to any other person by delivering to the secretary of state, for filing pursuant to part 3 of this article, a statement of transfer of reserved name that states the reserved name, the name of the holder, and the name and mailing address of the transferee.

If a constituent filed document stating a delayed effective date and stating a new domestic entity name is filed in the records of the secretary of state, such domestic entity name shall be deemed to be a reserved name until the constituent filed document becomes effective.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire part added, p. 975, § 47, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 1844, § 101, effective July 1; (1) and (2) amended, p. 1708, § 99, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 2300, § 214, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(1) and (3) amended, p. 1486, § 228, effective July 1; (1) amended, p. 1544, § 6, effective May 30, 2006.

L. 2005:

(2) amended, p. 1210, § 15, effective October 1.

L. 2006:

(1) amended, p. 875, § 59, effective July 1.

7-90-603. Assumed entity name of foreign entity.

If the name that a foreign entity would use as its foreign entity name is not permitted to be used by the foreign entity under section 7-90-601, the foreign entity, in order to obtain authority to transact business or conduct activities in this state, shall assume for use in this state as its foreign entity name a foreign entity name that would comply with section 7-90-601.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire part added, p. 975, § 47, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 2300, § 215, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 1487, § 229, effective July 1.

7-90-604. Registered true name of a foreign entity.

A foreign entity that is not authorized to transact business or conduct activities in this state may register its true name, if that true name is a name that could be the entity name of the foreign entity if the foreign entity were authorized to transact business or conduct activities in this state. Such registration shall be effective through December 31 of the year in which the filing becomes effective.

A foreign entity may register a true name pursuant to this section by delivering to the secretary of state, for filing pursuant to part 3 of this article 90, a statement of registration of true name that complies with the requirements of this subsection (2). When filed, the statement of registration of true name registers the true name. The statement of registration of true name must state:

The foreign entity's true name;

The jurisdiction under the law of which the foreign entity is formed;

The form of the foreign entity as that form is recognized by the jurisdiction under the law of which the entity is formed; and

The principal office address of the foreign entity's principal office.

A foreign entity that has in effect a registration of its true name pursuant to this section may renew the registration by delivering to the secretary of state, for filing pursuant to part 3 of this article 90, on or before December 31 of the year of registration, a statement of renewal of registration of true name that complies with this subsection (3). When filed, the statement of renewal of registration renews the registration for the following year. The statement of renewal of registration of true name must state:

The foreign entity's true name, the registration of which is to be renewed;

The form of entity and the jurisdiction under the law of which the foreign entity is formed; and

The principal office address of the foreign entity's principal office.

(3.5) No statement of renewal of registration of true name shall state a delayed effective date.

A foreign entity that has in effect a registration of its true name may transfer such registration to another foreign entity, if the transferee is not then authorized to transact business or conduct activities in Colorado, if that name is also the true name of the transferee and if, concurrently with the delivery of the foreign entity's statement of transfer of registration of true name to the secretary of state, for filing pursuant to part 3 of this article, the transferee delivers to the secretary of state a statement of registration of true name pursuant to this section.

A foreign entity that has in effect a registration of its true name may transfer the registration to another foreign entity, whether or not that name is the true name of the transferee, if the transferee is then authorized to transact business or conduct activities in Colorado and if, concurrently with the delivery of the foreign entity's statement of transfer of registration of true name to the secretary of state pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (4), the transferee delivers to the secretary of state, for filing pursuant to part 3 of this article, either:

A statement of trade name stating the transferred name as a trade name of the transferee pursuant to section

7-71-101

;

A statement of reservation of name reserving the transferred name as an entity name of the transferee pursuant to section

7-90-602

; or

A statement of change to the transferee's statement of foreign entity authority changing the assumed entity name of the transferee to the transferred name or stating that the transferee has acquired rights to use the transferred name as its true name in Colorado, as the case may be.

A foreign entity that has in effect a registration of its true name may transfer such registration to another foreign entity, although that name is not the true name of the transferee, if, concurrently with the delivery of the foreign entity's statement of transfer of registration of true name to the secretary of state pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (4), the transferee delivers to the secretary of state, for filing pursuant to part 3 of this article, a statement of foreign entity authority stating the transferred name as its assumed entity name under section

7-90-803 (1)(a)

.

A foreign entity that has in effect a registration of its true name may transfer such registration to a person other than a foreign entity, although that name is not the true name of the transferee, if, concurrently with the delivery of the foreign entity's statement of transfer of registration of true name to the secretary of state pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (4), the transferee delivers to the secretary of state, for filing pursuant to part 3 of this article, either:

A statement of trade name stating the transferred name as a trade name pursuant to section

7-71-101

;

A statement of reservation of name reserving the transferred name as an entity name pursuant to section

7-90-602

; or

An amendment or statement of change to the transferee's constituent filed document changing the entity's domestic entity name to the transferred name.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2007, p. 243, § 36, effective May 29, 2007.)

The transfer of the registration of the true name shall be effected by the current registrant's delivery to the secretary of state, for filing pursuant to part 3 of this article, of a statement of transfer of registered name that states:

The true name of the foreign entity;

The name of the jurisdiction under the law of which it is formed;

The entity name of the transferee or, if the transferee does not have an entity name, the true name of the transferee;

The name of the jurisdiction under the law of which the transferee is formed; and

That the registration of the true name is transferred by the entity to the transferee pursuant to this section.

When the statement of transfer of registered name and each other document, if any, required by this subsection (4) to be delivered concurrently to the secretary of state with the statement of transfer of registered name is filed, the transfer of the registration of true name is transferred.

(4.5) A foreign entity that has in effect a registration of its true name may deliver to the secretary of state, for filing pursuant to part 3 of this article, a statement of foreign entity authority stating that name as its true name.

A foreign entity that has in effect a registration of its true name may relinquish the registration at any time by delivering to the secretary of state, for filing pursuant to part 3 of this article, a statement of change stating the foreign entity's true name and stating that the registration is relinquished. When filed, the statement of change withdraws the registration of true name.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire part added, p. 975, § 47, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

IP(2) and (3) to (5) amended, p. 1844, § 102, effective July 1; IP(2) and (3) to (5) amended, p. 1709, § 100, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 2301, § 216, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 1487, § 230, effective July 1; (4)(b)(II), (4)(d)(II), and (4)(e) amended, p. 1545, § 7, effective May 30, 2006.

L. 2006:

(2)(b), (2)(e), and (3)(b) amended, p. 875, § 60, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(3.5) and (4.5) added and IP(4)(d) and (4)(e) amended, p. 243, §§ 35, 36, effective May 29.

L. 2009:

IP(3), (3)(b), and (3)(c) amended and (3)(d) added, (HB 09-1248), ch. 252, p. 1133, § 15, effective December 1.

L. 2019:

(2) and (3) amended, (SB 19-086), ch. 166, p. 1921, § 21, effective July 1, 2020.